New York, session 2025-2026, S10512.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3224-a of the insurance law is amended by adding a 2 new subsection (m) to read as follows: 3 (m) Payments to nonparticipating or nonpreferred providers licensed 4 under the public health law or the education law. (1) Whenever an insur- 5 er or an organization, or corporation licensed or certified pursuant to 6 article forty-three or forty-seven of this chapter or article forty-four 7 of the public health law provides that any health care claims submitted 8 under contracts or agreements issued or entered into pursuant to this 9 article or article forty-two, forty-three or forty-seven of this chapter 10 and article forty-four of the public health law are payable to a partic- 11 ipating or preferred provider for services rendered, the insurer, organ- 12 ization, or corporation licensed or certified pursuant to article 13 forty-three or forty-seven of this chapter or article forty-four of the 14 public health law shall be required to pay such benefits either directly 15 to any similarly licensed nonparticipating or nonpreferred provider at 16 the usual and customary charge, which shall not be excessive or unrea- 17 sonable, when the provider has rendered such services, has on file a 18 duly executed assignment of benefits, and has caused notice of such 19 assignment to be given to the insurer, organization, or corporation 20 licensed or certified pursuant to article forty-three or forty-seven of 21 this chapter or article forty-four of the public health law or jointly 22 to such nonparticipating or nonpreferred provider and to the insured, 23 subscriber, or other covered person; provided, however, that in either 24 case the insurer, organization, or corporation licensed or certified 25 pursuant to article forty-three or forty-seven of this chapter or arti- 26 cle forty-four of the public health law shall be required to send such 27 benefit payments directly to the provider who has the assignment on 28 file. When payment is made directly to a provider as authorized by this EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13775-02-6 S. 10512 2 1 section, the insurer, organization, or corporation licensed or certified 2 pursuant to article forty-three or forty-seven of this chapter or arti- 3 cle forty-four of the public health law shall give written notice of 4 such payment to the insured, subscriber, or other covered person. 5 (2) An insurer shall provide reimbursement for those services 6 prescribed by this section at rates negotiated between the insurer and 7 the provider of such services. In the absence of agreed upon rates, an 8 insurer shall pay for such services at the usual and customary charge, 9 which shall not be excessive or unreasonable. 10 (3) A nonparticipating or nonpreferred provider shall not seek advance 11 payment, deposits, or full payment for covered services from an insured, 12 subscriber, or other covered person unless and until the provider has 13 first submitted a claim to the applicable insurer and the claim has been 14 adjudicated. Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to 15 prohibit the payment of different levels of benefits or from having 16 differences in coinsurance percentages applicable to benefit levels for 17 services provided by participating or preferred providers and nonpartic- 18 ipating or nonpreferred providers. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027 and shall apply to 20 health care claims submitted for payment after such date.